Illinois, session 104th, SB3641.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 5changing Section 4.1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/4.1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2214.1)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-594)8    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations.9    (a) In this Section, "third-party vendor" means a 10third-party fingerprinting vendor who is licensed by the 11Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and 12regulated by 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1240.600.13    (b) The Department shall require that each child care 14facility license applicant as part of the application process, 15and each employee and volunteer of a child care facility or 16non-licensed service provider, as a condition of employment, 17authorize an investigation to determine if such applicant, 18employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a crime and 19if so, the disposition of those charges; this authorization 20shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the agencies which 21may be contacted. An employee or volunteer of a day care 22center, day care home, or group day care home shall authorize 23an investigation every 5 years, as required under the Child   SB3641- 2 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1Care and Development Block Grant. A child care facility, 2non-licensed service provider, day care center, group day care 3home, or day care home may authorize the Department or a 4third-party vendor to collect fingerprints for the 5investigation. If a third-party vendor is used for 6fingerprinting, then the child care facility, non-licensed 7service provider, day care center, group day care home, or day 8care home shall pay the third-party vendor for that service 9directly. If a child care facility, non-licensed service 10provider, day care center, group day care home, or day care 11home authorizes the Department or a third-party vendor to 12collect fingerprints for the investigation, the Director shall 13request and receive information and assistance from any 14federal, State, or local governmental agency as part of the 15authorized investigation. Each applicant, employee, or 16volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 17provider shall submit the applicant's, employee's, or 18volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in the 19form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. These 20fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint records 21now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police and 22Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history records 23databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a fee for 24conducting the criminal history records check, which shall be 25deposited into in the State Police Services Fund and shall not 26exceed the actual cost of the records check. The Illinois   SB3641- 3 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1State Police shall provide information concerning any criminal 2charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter filed, 3against an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care 4facility or non-licensed service provider upon request of the 5Department of Children and Family Services when the request is 6made in the form and manner required by the Illinois State 7Police.8    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 9employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 10non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 11including the source of the information and any conclusions or 12recommendations derived from the information, shall be 13provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 14volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 15provider prior to final action by the Department on the 16application. State conviction information provided by the 17Illinois State Police regarding employees, prospective 18employees, or volunteers of non-licensed service providers and 19child care facilities licensed under this Act shall be 20provided to the operator of such facility, and, upon request, 21to the employee, prospective employee, or volunteer of a child 22care facility or non-licensed service provider. Any 23information concerning criminal charges and the disposition of 24such charges obtained by the Department shall be confidential 25and may not be transmitted outside the Department, except as 26required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone within   SB3641- 4 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1the Department except as needed for the purpose of evaluating 2an application or an employee or volunteer of a child care 3facility or non-licensed service provider. Only information 4and standards which bear a reasonable and rational relation to 5the performance of a child care facility shall be used by the 6Department or any licensee. Any employee of the Department of 7Children and Family Services, Illinois State Police, or a 8child care facility receiving confidential information under 9this Section who gives or causes to be given any confidential 10information concerning any criminal convictions of an 11applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 12non-licensed service provider, shall be guilty of a Class A 13misdemeanor unless release of such information is authorized 14by this Section.15    The Department of Children and Family Services, through 16June 30, 2026, or the Department of Early Childhood, on and 17after July 1, 2026, shall allow day care centers, day care 18homes, and group day care homes to hire, on a probationary 19basis, any employee or volunteer authorizing a criminal 20background investigation under this Section after receiving a 21qualifying result, as determined by the Department of Children 22and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, 23whichever is applicable, pursuant to this Act, from either: 24        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 25    criminal background check; or26        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal   SB3641- 5 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1    background check and a criminal record check of the 2    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 3    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.4    Pending full clearance of all background check 5requirements, the prospective employee or volunteer must be 6supervised at all times by an individual who received a 7qualifying result on all background check components. 8Employees and volunteers of a day care center, day care home, 9or group day care home shall be notified prior to hiring that 10such employment may be terminated on the basis of criminal 11background information obtained by the facility.12(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-1072, eff. 1-1-26; 13104-307, eff. 1-1-26; revised 10-27-25.) 14    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-594)15    Sec. 4.1. Criminal background investigations. 16    (a) In this Section, "third-party vendor" means a 17third-party fingerprinting vendor who is licensed by the 18Department of Financial and Professional Regulation and 19regulated by 68 Ill. Adm. Code 1240.600.20    (b) Except as provided in Section 20-25 of the Department 21of Early Childhood Act, the The Department of Children and 22Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood shall 23require that each child care facility license applicant under 24the agencies' respective authority as part of the application 25process, and each employee and volunteer of a child care   SB3641- 6 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1facility or non-licensed service provider, as a condition of 2employment, authorize an investigation to determine if such 3applicant, employee, or volunteer has ever been charged with a 4crime and if so, the disposition of those charges; this 5authorization shall indicate the scope of the inquiry and the 6agencies which may be contacted. An employee or volunteer of a 7day care center, day care home, or group day care home shall 8authorize an investigation every 5 years, as required under 9the Child Care and Development Block Grant. A child care 10facility, non-licensed service provider, day care center, 11group day care home, or day care home may authorize the 12Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of 13Early Childhood, or a third-party vendor to collect 14fingerprints for the investigation. If a third-party vendor is 15used for fingerprinting, then the child care facility, 16non-licensed service provider, day care center, group day care 17home, or day care home shall pay the third-party vendor for 18that service directly. If a child care facility, non-licensed 19service provider, day care center, group day care home, or day 20care home authorizes the Department of Children and Family 21Services, the Department of Early Childhood, or a third-party 22vendor to collect fingerprints for the investigation, the 23Director of Children and Family Services or the Secretary of 24Early Childhood shall request and receive information and 25assistance from any federal, State, or local governmental 26agency as part of the authorized investigation. Each   SB3641- 7 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 2non-licensed service provider shall submit the applicant's, 3employee's, or volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State 4Police in the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State 5Police. These fingerprints shall be checked against the 6fingerprint records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois 7State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal 8history records databases. The Illinois State Police shall 9charge a fee for conducting the criminal history records 10check, which shall be deposited into in the State Police 11Services Fund and shall not exceed the actual cost of the 12records check. The Illinois State Police shall provide 13information concerning any criminal charges, and their 14disposition, now or hereafter filed, against an applicant, 15employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 16non-licensed service provider upon request of the Department 17of Children and Family Services or the Department of Early 18Childhood when the request is made in the form and manner 19required by the Illinois State Police.20    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 21employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 22non-licensed service provider investigated under this Section, 23including the source of the information and any conclusions or 24recommendations derived from the information, shall be 25provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, or 26volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service   SB3641- 8 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1provider prior to final action by the Department of Children 2and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood under 3the agencies' respective authority on the application. State 4conviction information provided by the Illinois State Police 5regarding employees, prospective employees, or volunteers of 6non-licensed service providers and child care facilities 7licensed under this Act shall be provided to the operator of 8such facility, and, upon request, to the employee, prospective 9employee, or volunteer of a child care facility or 10non-licensed service provider. Any information concerning 11criminal charges and the disposition of such charges obtained 12by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 13Department of Early Childhood shall be confidential and may 14not be transmitted outside the Department of Children and 15Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, except 16as required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone 17within the Department of Children and Family Services or the 18Department of Early Childhood except as needed for the purpose 19of evaluating an application or an employee or volunteer of a 20child care facility or non-licensed service provider. Only 21information and standards which bear a reasonable and rational 22relation to the performance of a child care facility shall be 23used by the Department of Children and Family Services or the 24Department of Early Childhood or any licensee. Any employee of 25the Department of Children and Family Services, Department of 26Early Childhood, Illinois State Police, or a child care   SB3641- 9 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1facility receiving confidential information under this Section 2who gives or causes to be given any confidential information 3concerning any criminal convictions of an applicant, employee, 4or volunteer of a child care facility or non-licensed service 5provider, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless 6release of such information is authorized by this Section.7    The Department of Children and Family Services, through 8June 30, 2026, or the Department of Early Childhood, on and 9after July 1, 2026, shall allow day care centers, day care 10homes, and group day care homes to hire, on a probationary 11basis, any employee or volunteer authorizing a criminal 12background investigation under this Section after receiving a 13qualifying result, as determined by the Department of Children 14and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood, 15whichever is applicable, pursuant to this Act, from either: 16        (1) the Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint 17    criminal background check; or18        (2) the Illinois State Police fingerprint criminal 19    background check and a criminal record check of the 20    criminal repository of each state in which the employee or 21    volunteer resided during the preceding 5 years.22    Pending full clearance of all background check 23requirements, the prospective employee or volunteer must be 24supervised at all times by an individual who received a 25qualifying result on all background check components. 26Employees and volunteers of a day care center, day care home,   SB3641- 10 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1or group day care home shall be notified prior to hiring that 2such employment may be terminated on the basis of criminal 3background information obtained by the facility.4    Beginning July 1, 2026, the authority and responsibility 5to conduct a fingerprint-based criminal history check on 6providers of day care at day care centers defined under 7Section 2.09, part day child care facilities defined under 8Section 2.10, day care homes defined under Section 2.18, and 9group day care homes defined under Section 2.20 shall transfer 10to the Department of Early Childhood in accordance with 11Section 80-5 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. 12(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-594, eff. 7-1-26; 13103-1072, eff. 1-1-26; 104-307, eff. 1-1-26; revised 1410-27-25.) 15    Section 10. The Department of Early Childhood Act is 16amended by changing Sections 10-15 and 20-25 as follows: 17    (325 ILCS 3/10-15)18    Sec. 10-15. Definitions. As used in this Act:19    (a) "Eligible infants and toddlers" means infants and 20toddlers under 36 months of age with any of the following 21conditions:22        (1) Developmental delays.23        (2) A physical or mental condition which typically 24    results in developmental delay.  SB3641- 11 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1        (3) Being at risk of having substantial developmental 2    delays based on informed clinical opinion.3        (4) Either (A) having entered the program under any of 4    the circumstances listed in paragraphs (1) through (3) of 5    this subsection but no longer meeting the current 6    eligibility criteria under those paragraphs, and 7    continuing to have any measurable delay, or (B) not having 8    attained a level of development in each area, including 9    (i) cognitive, (ii) physical (including vision and 10    hearing), (iii) language, speech, and communication, (iv) 11    social or emotional, or (v) adaptive, that is at least at 12    the mean of the child's age equivalent peers; and, in 13    addition to either item (A) or item (B), (C) having been 14    determined by the multidisciplinary individualized family 15    service plan team to require the continuation of early 16    intervention services in order to support continuing 17    developmental progress, pursuant to the child's needs and 18    provided in an appropriate developmental manner. The type, 19    frequency, and intensity of services shall differ from the 20    initial individualized family services plan because of the 21    child's developmental progress, and may consist of only 22    service coordination, evaluation, and assessments.23    "Eligible infants and toddlers" includes any child under 24the age of 3 who is the subject of a substantiated case of 25child abuse or neglect as defined in the federal Child Abuse 26Prevention and Treatment Act.  SB3641- 12 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1    (b) "Developmental delay" means a delay in one or more of 2the following areas of childhood development as measured by 3appropriate diagnostic instruments and standard procedures: 4cognitive; physical, including vision and hearing; language, 5speech and communication; social or emotional; or adaptive. 6The term means a delay of 30% or more below the mean in 7function in one or more of those areas.8    (c) "Physical or mental condition which typically results 9in developmental delay" means:10        (1) a diagnosed medical disorder or exposure to a 11    toxic substance bearing a relatively well known expectancy 12    for developmental outcomes within varying ranges of 13    developmental disabilities; or14        (2) a history of prenatal, perinatal, neonatal or 15    early developmental events suggestive of biological 16    insults to the developing central nervous system and which 17    either singly or collectively increase the probability of 18    developing a disability or delay based on a medical 19    history.20    (d) "Informed clinical opinion" means both clinical 21observations and parental participation to determine 22eligibility by a consensus of a multidisciplinary team of 2 or 23more members based on their professional experience and 24expertise.25    (e) "Early intervention services" means services which:26        (1) are designed to meet the developmental needs of   SB3641- 13 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1    each child eligible under this Act and the needs of his or 2    her family;3        (2) are selected in collaboration with the child's 4    family;5        (3) are provided under public supervision;6        (4) are provided at no cost except where a schedule of 7    sliding scale fees or other system of payments by families 8    has been adopted in accordance with State and federal law;9        (5) are designed to meet an infant's or toddler's 10    developmental needs in any of the following areas:11            (A) physical development, including vision and 12        hearing,13            (B) cognitive development,14            (C) communication development,15            (D) social or emotional development, or16            (E) adaptive development;17        (6) meet the standards of the State, including the 18    requirements of this Act;19        (7) include one or more of the following:20            (A) family training,21            (B) social work services, including counseling, 22        and home visits,23            (C) special instruction,24            (D) speech, language pathology and audiology,25            (E) occupational therapy,26            (F) physical therapy,  SB3641- 14 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1            (G) psychological services,2            (H) service coordination services,3            (I) medical services only for diagnostic or 4        evaluation purposes,5            (J) early identification, screening, and 6        assessment services,7            (K) health services specified by the lead agency 8        as necessary to enable the infant or toddler to 9        benefit from the other early intervention services,10            (L) vision services,11            (M) transportation,12            (N) assistive technology devices and services,13            (O) nursing services,14            (P) nutrition services, and15            (Q) sign language and cued language services;16        (8) are provided by qualified personnel, including but 17    not limited to:18            (A) child development specialists or special 19        educators, including teachers of children with hearing 20        impairments (including deafness) and teachers of 21        children with vision impairments (including 22        blindness),23            (B) speech and language pathologists and 24        audiologists,25            (C) occupational therapists,26            (D) physical therapists,  SB3641- 15 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1            (E) social workers,2            (F) nurses,3            (G) dietitian nutritionists,4            (H) vision specialists, including ophthalmologists 5        and optometrists,6            (I) psychologists, and7            (J) physicians;8        (9) are provided in conformity with an Individualized 9    Family Service Plan;10        (10) are provided throughout the year; and11        (11) are provided in natural environments, to the 12    maximum extent appropriate, which may include the home and 13    community settings, unless justification is provided 14    consistent with federal regulations adopted under Sections 15    1431 through 1444 of Title 20 of the United States Code.16    (f) "Individualized Family Service Plan" or "Plan" means a 17written plan for providing early intervention services to a 18child eligible under this Act and the child's family, as set 19forth in Section 10-65.20    (g) "Local interagency agreement" means an agreement 21entered into by local community and State and regional 22agencies receiving early intervention funds directly from the 23State and made in accordance with State interagency agreements 24providing for the delivery of early intervention services 25within a local community area.26    (h) "Council" means the Illinois Interagency Council on   SB3641- 16 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1Early Intervention established under Section 10-30.2    (i) "Lead agency" means the Department of Early Childhood 3which is the State agency responsible for administering this 4Act and receiving and disbursing public funds received in 5accordance with State and federal law and rules. 6    (i-5) "Central billing office" means the central billing 7office created by the lead agency under Section 10-75.8    (j) "Child find" means a service which identifies eligible 9infants and toddlers.10    (k) "Regional intake entity" means the lead agency's 11designated entity responsible for implementation of the Early 12Intervention Services System within its designated geographic 13area.14    (l) "Early intervention provider" means an individual who 15is qualified, as defined by the lead agency, to provide one or 16more types of early intervention services, and who has 17enrolled as a provider in the early intervention program.18    (m) "Fully credentialed early intervention provider" means 19an individual who has met the standards in the State 20applicable to the relevant profession, and has met such other 21qualifications as the lead agency has determined are suitable 22for personnel providing early intervention services, including 23pediatric experience, education, and continuing education. The 24lead agency shall establish these qualifications by rule filed 25no later than 180 days after the effective date of this Act.26    (n) "Telehealth" has the meaning given to that term in   SB3641- 17 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1Section 5 of the Telehealth Act.2    (o) "Department" means Department of Early Childhood 3unless otherwise specified. 4(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.) 5    (325 ILCS 3/20-25)6    Sec. 20-25. Licensing day care facilities. 7    (a) Beginning July 1, 2024, the Department of Early 8Childhood and the Department of Children and Family Services 9shall collaborate and plan for the transition of 10administrative responsibilities related to licensing day care 11centers, day care homes, and group day care homes as 12prescribed throughout the Child Care Act of 1969. 13    (b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department of Early 14Childhood shall manage all facets of licensing for day care 15centers, day care homes, and group day care homes as 16prescribed throughout the Child Care Act of 1969. 17    (c) Beginning July 1, 2026, the authority and 18responsibility to conduct a fingerprint-based criminal history 19check on providers of day care at day care centers defined 20under Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969, part day 21child care facilities defined under Section 2.10 of the Child 22Care Act of 1969, day care homes defined under Section 2.18 of 23the Child Care Act of 1969, and group day care homes defined 24under Section 2.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969 shall transfer 25to the Department of Early Childhood in accordance with   SB3641- 18 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1Section 80-5 of this Act.2    (d) Criminal background investigations. As it pertains to 3providers as set forth in subsection (c), the Department of 4Early Childhood shall require that each day care license 5applicant, as a condition of licensure, and, each applicant, 6employee, and volunteer of a licensed day care facility, as a 7condition of employment, authorize an investigation to 8determine if such applicant, employee, or volunteer has ever 9been charged with a crime and if so, the disposition of those 10charges. This authorization shall indicate the scope of the 11inquiry and the agencies which may be contacted. Upon this 12authorization, the Secretary shall request and receive 13information and assistance from any federal, State, or local 14governmental agency as part of the authorized investigation. 15Each license applicant and each employee or volunteer of a 16licensed day care facility shall submit the applicant's, 17employee's, or volunteer's fingerprints to the Illinois State 18Police in the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State 19Police. Such fingerprints shall be transmitted through a live 20scan fingerprint vendor licensed by the Department of 21Financial and Professional Regulation. The fingerprints 22submitted in accordance with this Section shall be checked 23against the Illinois State Police and Federal Bureau of 24Investigation criminal history record databases, now and 25hereafter filed, including, but not limited to, civil, 26criminal, and latent fingerprint databases. The fingerprints   SB3641- 19 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1shall be checked against the Illinois State Police criminal 2history databases prior to their submission to the Federal 3Bureau of Investigation. The Illinois State Police shall 4charge a fee for conducting the criminal history records 5check, which shall be deposited into the State Police Services 6Fund and shall not exceed the actual cost of the records check. 7The Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 8identification, records of Illinois criminal charges, and 9their disposition, against an applicant, employee, or 10volunteer and shall forward the national criminal history 11record information to the lead agency.12    Information concerning convictions of a license applicant, 13employee, or volunteer of a day care center defined under 14Section 2.09 of the Child Care Act of 1969, part day child care 15facility defined under Section 2.10 of the Child Care Act of 161969, day care home defined under Section 2.18 of the Child 17Care Act of 1969, or group day care home defined under Section 182.20 of the Child Care Act of 1969, investigated under this 19Section, including the source of the information and any 20conclusions or recommendations derived from the information, 21shall be provided, upon request, to such applicant, employee, 22or volunteer prior to final action by the Department of Early 23Childhood. Any information concerning criminal charges and the 24disposition of such charges obtained by the Department of 25Early Childhood shall be confidential and may not be 26transmitted outside the Department of Early Childhood, except   SB3641- 20 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1as required herein, and may not be transmitted to anyone 2within the Department of Early Childhood except as needed for 3the purpose of evaluating providers of day care at day care 4centers, part day child care facilities, day care homes, and 5group day care homes. Only information and standards which 6bear a reasonable and rational relation to the performance of 7a day care center, part day child care facility, day care home, 8or group day care home shall be used by the Department of Early 9Childhood. Any employee of the Department of Early Childhood 10or Illinois State Police receiving confidential information 11under this Section who gives or causes to be given any 12confidential information concerning any criminal convictions 13of an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a day care center, 14part day child care facility, day care home, or group day care 15home shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless release of 16such information is authorized under this Section.17    A licensed day care facility may hire, on a probationary 18basis, any employee or volunteer of a licensed day care 19provider authorizing a criminal background investigation under 20this Section, pending the result of such investigation. 21Employees and volunteers of a licensed day care provider shall 22be notified prior to hiring that such employment may be 23terminated on the basis of criminal background information 24obtained by the licensed day care.25(Source: P.A. 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.)   SB3641- 21 -LRB104 18686 KTG 32129 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.